Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-833
Authority; loans authorized; limitation.

The
authority may make loans to any eligible institution for the
cost of any project or in anticipation of the receipt of tuition or other revenue by the eligible institution in accordance
with an agreement between the authority and such eligible institution, except that (1) no such
loan shall exceed the total cost of such project as determined by such eligible institution and approved by the authority
and (2) any loan made in anticipation of the receipt of tuition or other revenue shall not
exceed the anticipated amount of tuition or
other revenue to be received by the eligible institution in the
one-year period following the date of such loan.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 30;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2930;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 30;

Laws 2003, LB 107, § 1;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1730;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 33.